lexc/verb/enhuigeg.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+ +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igeuo§ 
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§felteo§ §j§ §szorelol§ §tatt§ 
§sj§ §l§ §igeoo§ 

LEXICON Root
Verb;
Verb1;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;

LEXICON Verb1
arrébbforgat AddVerb;
arrébbmozgat AddVerb;
arrébbvontat AddVerb;
együttfuttat AddVerb;
együtthat AddVerb;
együttmulat AddVerb;
együttpenget AddVerb;
fölécsúsztat AddVerb;
helybenhallgat AddVerb;
közécsúsztat AddVerb;
közészaggat AddVerb;
mögélát AddVerb;
mögélát AddVerbeek;
mögélát AddVerblatniok;
odábbtologat AddVerb;
odébbgörget AddVerb;
odébbmozgat AddVerb;
teliaggat AddVerb;
telihordat AddVerb;
telireszket AddVerb;
viszontgyanúsítgat AddVerb;
viszontlát AddVerb;
viszontlát AddVerbeek;
viszontlát AddVerblatniok;
viszonttámogat AddVerb;


!ír
!írhat  potential
!irathat imper potential
!irat imper
!irattattat imper imper
!irjon command
!írhasson
!írogattathat rep imper pot
!íratgathat
!írogattatgat
!Irni
!írnék, írnál .. írnának cond conditional
! írjak írjon írj  command

LEXICON AddVerb
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep;

LEXICON Rep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imper;
                    Imper1;

LEXICON Imper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep2;
LEXICON Imper1
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep1;

LEXICON Nrep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;
LEXICON Nrep2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;

LEXICON Nrep1
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper1;

LEXICON NImper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;
LEXICON NImper2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;

LEXICON NImper1
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot1;

LEXICON Pot
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;
LEXICON Pot2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;

LEXICON Pot1
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case; ! case1 if differs
LEXICON AddInf
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
               Case;

LEXICON Verb
adogat AddVerb;
adóztat AddVerb;
aggat AddVerb;
ajánlgat AddVerb;
alakítgat AddVerb;
altat AddVerb;
apasztat AddVerb;
autózgat AddVerb;
babrálgat AddVerb;
baktat AddVerb;
becézget AddVerb;
betűzget AddVerb;
billeget AddVerb;
billentet AddVerb;
bizonygat AddVerb;
bizserget AddVerb;
biztatgat AddVerb;
bolygat AddVerb;
boncolgat AddVerb;
bontogat AddVerb;
borozgat AddVerb;
borzogat AddVerb;
borítgat AddVerb;
botránkoztat AddVerb;
bugyolálgat AddVerb;
bujtogat AddVerb;
burjánoztat AddVerb;
bántat AddVerb;
békéltet AddVerb;
bírálgat AddVerb;
bólingat AddVerb;
bólongat AddVerb;
bököget AddVerb;
búgat AddVerb;
bőget AddVerb;
caplat AddVerb;
cirógat AddVerb;
csalogat AddVerb;
csappantat AddVerb;
csattogtat AddVerb;
csenet AddVerb;
csepegtet AddVerb;
cserbenhagyat AddVerb;
cserélget AddVerb;
csettintget AddVerb;
csicsígat AddVerb;
csillogtat AddVerb;
csipeget AddVerb;
csiszolgat AddVerb;
csombolygat AddVerb;
csucsujgat AddVerb;
csukogat AddVerb;
csábítgat AddVerb;
csípet AddVerb;
csíráztat AddVerb;
csórat AddVerb;
csönget AddVerb;
csúsztat AddVerb;
dagasztat AddVerb;
danolgat AddVerb;
dicsérget AddVerb;
dobat AddVerb;
dobogtat AddVerb;
dolgozgat AddVerb;
dugat AddVerb;
duggat AddVerb;
durrantat AddVerb;
durrogtat AddVerb;
duzzasztat AddVerb;
döfet AddVerb;
döntöget AddVerb;
dúdolgat AddVerb;
ebédeltet AddVerb;
egyenget AddVerb;
egzecíroztat AddVerb;
ejtet AddVerb;
ellet AddVerb;
emelintet AddVerb;
emlékeztet AddVerb;
epesztet AddVerb;
ereget AddVerb;
eresztget AddVerb;
ernyesztet AddVerb;
eseget AddVerb;
estet AddVerb;
etet AddVerb;
faggat AddVerb;
fagyat AddVerb;
falat AddVerb;
feddet AddVerb;
fejet AddVerb;
fejteget AddVerb;
fektet AddVerb;
felelget AddVerb;
feleselget AddVerb;
fenyeget AddVerb;
festet AddVerb;
figyelget AddVerb;
filozofálgat AddVerb;
fintorgat AddVerb;
firkálgat AddVerb;
fitogtat AddVerb;
fizettet AddVerb;
fogat AddVerb;
fogyasztat AddVerb;
fojtat AddVerb;
foldat AddVerb;
folytat AddVerb;
fonnyasztat AddVerb;
fordítgat AddVerb;
forrasztat AddVerb;
foszlat AddVerb;
fosztogat AddVerb;
fullasztat AddVerb;
fuvolázgat AddVerb;
fárasztat AddVerb;
féltet AddVerb;
fújat AddVerb;
fújtat AddVerb;
fúrogat AddVerb;
füllentget AddVerb;
füttyentget AddVerb;
főzet AddVerb;
gennyesztet AddVerb;
gondolkodtat AddVerb;
gurgat AddVerb;
gyanúsítgat AddVerb;
gyullasztat AddVerb;
gyógyítgat AddVerb;
gyújtat AddVerb;
gyúrat AddVerb;
győzet AddVerb;
gyűret AddVerb;
gépírat AddVerb;
göngyölget AddVerb;
görget AddVerb;
haboztat AddVerb;
hagyogat AddVerb;
hajolgat AddVerb;
hajtogat AddVerb;
hallat AddVerb;
hallgattat AddVerb;
hamvasztat AddVerb;
hasogat AddVerb;
helybenhagyat AddVerb;
hemperget AddVerb;
hervasztat AddVerb;
hessentet AddVerb;
hintet AddVerb;
hirdet AddVerb;
hitet AddVerb;
horgasztat AddVerb;
hozat AddVerb;
hullat AddVerb;
hunyat AddVerb;
háborgat AddVerb;
hámlasztat AddVerb;
hányat AddVerb;
hánytorgat AddVerb;
hímezget AddVerb;
hívogat AddVerb;
hömpölyget AddVerb;
húzat AddVerb;
hümget AddVerb;
igazgat AddVerb;
igazítgat AddVerb;
ijesztet AddVerb;
iktat AddVerb;
illet AddVerb;
ingat AddVerb;
intet AddVerb;
ismertet AddVerb;
itatgat AddVerb;
izzat AddVerb;
jegyezget AddVerb;
járat AddVerb;
játszogat AddVerb;
jövöget AddVerb;
kamatoztat AddVerb;
kapcsolgat AddVerb;
kattintat AddVerb;
kedveltet AddVerb;
keltet AddVerb;
keresget AddVerb;
keverget AddVerb;
koccantat AddVerb;
kongat AddVerb;
koppintat AddVerb;
koslat AddVerb;
kotyvasztat AddVerb;
kurjantat AddVerb;
kápráztat AddVerb;
kérdet AddVerb;
késet AddVerb;
készíttet AddVerb;
kísérget AddVerb;
kóstolgat AddVerb;
kötettet AddVerb;
következtet AddVerb;
kúsztat AddVerb;
lakat AddVerb;
lapogat AddVerb;
lebegtet AddVerb;
legyintet AddVerb;
leplezget AddVerb;
locsolgat AddVerb;
luggat AddVerb;
látogat AddVerb;
lépet AddVerb;
löket AddVerb;
magyarázgat AddVerb;
masíroztat AddVerb;
menesztet AddVerb;
meresztet AddVerb;
mondogat AddVerb;
mosogat AddVerb;
mulat AddVerb;
mutogat AddVerb;
mártogat AddVerb;
méltóztat AddVerb;
múlat AddVerb;
nyaggat AddVerb;
nyekerget AddVerb;
nyeset AddVerb;
nyisszantat AddVerb;
nyomintat AddVerb;
nyomtat AddVerb;
nyírat AddVerb;
nyújtóztat AddVerb;
nógat AddVerb;
oktat AddVerb;
olvasgat AddVerb;
ontat AddVerb;
osztogat AddVerb;
passzolgat AddVerb;
pattogtat AddVerb;
perget AddVerb;
pillantat AddVerb;
poharazgat AddVerb;
poshasztat AddVerb;
puffantat AddVerb;
puszilgat AddVerb;
pödret AddVerb;
ragasztat AddVerb;
rakosgat AddVerb;
rekesztet AddVerb;
reptet AddVerb;
rettentet AddVerb;
rezzentet AddVerb;
rikoltat AddVerb;
robbantat AddVerb;
rothasztat AddVerb;
rábízat AddVerb;
rángat AddVerb;
rázogat AddVerb;
részeltet AddVerb;
sanyargat AddVerb;
sepreget AddVerb;
sikkasztat AddVerb;
simogat AddVerb;
sorakoztat AddVerb;
suhogtat AddVerb;
szabat AddVerb;
szakasztat AddVerb;
szedeget AddVerb;
szellentget AddVerb;
szerepeltet AddVerb;
szidat AddVerb;
szippogat AddVerb;
szolgáltat AddVerb;
szorongat AddVerb;
szállat AddVerb;
számoltat AddVerb;
szárasztat AddVerb;
szélesztet AddVerb;
szólaltat AddVerb;
szórakoztat AddVerb;
szövöget AddVerb;
sérteget AddVerb;
söpröget AddVerb;
sütöget AddVerb;
tapasztat AddVerb;
tartogat AddVerb;
tekintet AddVerb;
tenget AddVerb;
teremtet AddVerb;
terpesztet AddVerb;
tikkasztat AddVerb;
tisztogat AddVerb;
toldat AddVerb;
tutujgat AddVerb;
táncoltat AddVerb;
tépet AddVerb;
tétet AddVerb;
tönkrejuttat AddVerb;
túrat AddVerb;
tűzet AddVerb;
ugat AddVerb;
untat AddVerb;
vagyogat AddVerb;
varrogat AddVerb;
verselget AddVerb;
veszteget AddVerb;
vettet AddVerb;
villogat AddVerb;
viszket AddVerb;
vizsgáztat AddVerb;
vonogat AddVerb;
vágtat AddVerb;
választat AddVerb;
változtat AddVerb;
védet AddVerb;
véreztet AddVerb;
zabáltat AddVerb;
zenget AddVerb;
zuhanyoztat AddVerb;
zúgat AddVerb;
állogat AddVerb;
ámítgat AddVerb;
ásat AddVerb;
édesget AddVerb;
élesztget AddVerb;
éreztet AddVerb;
érzékeltet AddVerb;
ígérget AddVerb;
óbégat AddVerb;
ölet AddVerb;
örvendeztet AddVerb;
üdvözölget AddVerb;
üzenget AddVerb;
